Utah statutes.
78A-6-324.   Mental health therapists.
(1)  When a mental health practitioner is appointed in any juvenile court
proceeding to evaluate the mental health of a parent or a minor, or to provide
mental health services to a parent or minor, the court:
(a)  may appoint any mental health therapist, as defined in Section 58-60-102,
which the court finds to be qualified; and
(b)  may not refuse to appoint a mental health therapist for the reason that
the therapist's recommendations in another case have not followed the
recommendations of the Division of Child and Family Services.
(2)  This section applies to all juvenile court proceedings involving:
(a)  parents and minors; or
(b)  the Division of Child and Family Services.
